zh-CN: 香具类型: 切割工具; 晾干架; 漏斗; 研磨工具 (研钵和杵); 制香挤压器; 制香模具; 香篆; 线香搓板; 量勺/舀勺; 混合碗; 混合刮刀; 防护手套; 筛子/过滤网; 印章/香印; 储物罐/容器; 其他
ro-RO: Tipul de instrument pentru tămâie: Instrument de tăiere; Suport de uscare; Pâlnie; Instrument de măcinat (mojar cu pistil); Extruder pentru tămâie; Formă pentru tămâie; Presă pentru tămâie; Placă de rulare pentru bețișoare parfumate; Lingură/cupă de măsurare; Bol de mixare; Spatulă de mixare; Mănuși de protecție; Sită/strecătoare; Ștampilă/sigiliu; Borcan/recipient de depozitare; Altele
es: Tipo de herramienta para incienso: Herramienta de corte; Rejilla de secado; Embudo; Herramienta de molienda (mortero y maja); Extrusora de incienso; Molde para incienso; Prensa para incienso; Tabla para enrollar varillas de incienso; Cuchara/cucharón medidor; Tazón para mezclar; Espátula para mezclar; Guantes protectores; Tamiz/colador; Sello/estampilla; Frasco/recipiente de almacenamiento; Otro
nb: Røkelsesverktøytype: Skjæreverktøy; Tørkestativ; Trakt; Kverneverktøy (morter og pistill); Røkelse-ekstruder; Røkelsesform; Røkelsespresse; Rullebrett for røkelsespinner; Måleskje/øse; Blandebolle; Blandespatel; Vernehansker; Sikt/sil; Stempel/segl; Oppbevaringsglass/-beholder; Annet
fr: Type d’outil pour encens: Outil de coupe; Séchoir; Entonnoir; Outil de broyage (mortier et pilon); Extrudeuse d’encens; Moule à encens; Presse à encens; Planche à rouler les bâtonnets d’encens; Cuillère doseuse; Bol de mélange; Spatule de mélange; Gants de protection; Tamis/passoire; Tampon/sceau; Pot/récipient de stockage; Autre
tr: Tütsü aleti türü: Kesme aleti; Kurutma askısı; Huni; Öğütme aleti (havan ve tokmak); Tütsü ekstrüderi; Tütsü kalıbı; Tütsü presi; Çubuk tütsü sarma tahtası; Ölçü kaşığı/kepçesi; Karıştırma kabı; Karıştırma spatulası; Koruyucu eldiven; Elek/süzgeç; Damga/mühür; Saklama kavanozu/kabı; Diğer
sl-SI: Vrsta orodja za kadilo: Orodje za rezanje; Stojalo za sušenje; Lijak; Orodje za drobljenje (terilnica s pestilom); Ekstruder za kadilo; Kalup za kadilo; Stiskalnica za kadilo; Deska za valjanje kadilnih palčk; Merilna žlica/zajemalka; Posoda za mešanje; Lopatica za mešanje; Zaščitne rokavice; Sito/cedilo; Žig/pečat; Kozarec/posoda za shranjevanje; Drugo
th: ประเภทอุปกรณ์จุดกำยาน: เครื่องมือตัด; ชั้นตาก; กรวย; เครื่องมือบด (ครกและสาก); เครื่องอัดธูป; แม่พิมพ์ธูป; เครื่องปั๊มธูป; กระดานคลึงธูปก้าน; ช้อนตวง/ที่ตัก; ชามผสม; ไม้พายผสม; ถุงมือป้องกัน; ตะแกรง/กระชอนร่อน; ตราประทับ; โหล/ภาชนะจัดเก็บ; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип инструмент за изработка на тамян: Режещ инструмент; Поставка за сушене; Фуния; Инструмент за смилане (хаванче и пестик); Екструдер за тамян; Форма за тамян; Преса за тамян; Дъска за навиване на ароматни пръчици; Мерителна лъжичка/гребка; Купа за смесване; Шпатула за смесване; Предпазни ръкавици; Сито/цедка; Печат/щрих; Буркан/контейнер за съхранение; Други
cs: Typ nástroje na kadidlo: Řezný nástroj; Sušicí stojan; Trychtýř; Drticí nástroj (hmoždíř a tlouček); Lis na vonné tyčinky; Forma na vonné tyčinky a kadidla; Lis na kadidlo; Deska na válení vonných tyčinek; Odměrka/lžička; Míchací miska; Míchací špachtle; Ochranné rukavice; Síto/cedník; Razítko/pečeť; Skladovací dóza/nádoba; Ostatní
ko: 향 도구 종류: 커팅 도구; 건조대; 깔때기; 분쇄 도구(막자 및 절구); 향 압출기; 향 몰드; 향 프레스; 향 스틱 롤링 보드; 계량스푼/스쿠프; 믹싱 볼; 믹싱 스패출러; 보호 장갑; 체/여과기; 도장/스탬프; 저장 병/용기; 기타
pl: Typ narzędzia do kadzideł: Narzędzie do cięcia; Suszarka; Lejek; Narzędzie do ucierania (moździerz i tłuczek); Wytłaczarka do kadzideł; Forma do kadzideł; Praska do kadzideł; Deska do rolowania kadzideł; Łyżka/miarka; Misa do mieszania; Szpatułka do mieszania; Rękawice ochronne; Sito/sitko; Stempel/pieczęć; Słoik/pojemnik do przechowywania; Inne
el: Τύπος εργαλείου θυμιάματος: Εργαλείο κοπής; Σχάρα στεγνώματος; Χωνί; Εργαλείο άλεσης (γουδί και γουδοχέρι); Μηχανή εξώθησης θυμιάματος; Καλούπι θυμιάματος; Πρέσα θυμιάματος; Πίνακας για τύλιγμα στικ θυμιάματος; Κουτάλι/μεζούρα μέτρησης; Μπολ ανάμειξης; Σπάτουλα ανάμειξης; Προστατευτικά γάντια; Σίτα/σουρωτήρι; Σφραγίδα; Βάζο/δοχείο αποθήκευσης; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ kadidlového nástroja: Rezný nástroj; Stojan na sušenie; Lievik; Nástroj na drvenie (mažiar a tĺčik); Extrudér na kadidlo; Forma na kadidlo; Lis na kadidlo; Doska na rolovanie vonných tyčiniek; Odmerná lyžica/odmerka; Miska na miešanie; Špachtľa na miešanie; Ochranné rukavice; Sito/sitko; Pečiatka/pečať; Dóza/nádoba na uskladnenie; Iné
pt-BR: Incenso tipo de ferramenta: Ferramenta de corte; Suporte de secagem; Funil; Ferramenta de moagem (almofariz e pilão); Extrusora de incenso; Molde para incenso; Prensa para incenso; Tábua de enrolar vareta de incenso; Colher de medição/concha; Tigela de mistura; Espátula de mistura; Luvas de proteção; Peneira/coador; Carimbo/selo; Pote/recipiente de armazenamento; Outro
vi: Loại dụng cụ làm hương: Dụng cụ cắt; Giá phơi; Phễu; Dụng cụ nghiền (cối & chày); Máy ép nhang; Khuôn làm nhang; Dụng cụ nén nhang; Bảng se nhang que; Thìa/muỗng lường; Tô trộn; Phới trộn; Găng tay bảo hộ; Rây/lưới lọc; Con dấu/mộc; Lọ/hộp đựng; Khác
hu: Füstölőeszköz típusa: Vágószerszám; Szárítóállvány; Tölcsér; Őrlőszerszám (mozsár és törő); Füstölő extrudáló; Füstölő forma; Füstölőprés; Füstölőpálcika-sodró deszka; Mérőkanál/-lapát; Keverőtál; Keverőspatula; Védőkesztyű; Szita/szűrő; Pecsét/nyomóforma; Tárolóedény/tartály; Egyéb
hr-HR: Vrsta alata za tamjan: Alat za rezanje; Stalak za sušenje; Lijevak; Alat za mljevenje (tarionik i tučak); Ekstruder za tamjan; Kalup za tamjan; Preša za tamjan; Daska za valjanje štapića tamjana; Žlica/mjerica za doziranje; Posuda za miješanje; Lopatica za miješanje; Zaštitne rukavice; Sito/cjedilo; Žig/pečat; Staklenka/posuda za pohranu; Ostalo
da: Type af røgelsesværktøj: Skæreværktøj; Tørrestativ; Tragt; Kværneværktøj (morter og støder); Røgelsesekstruder; Røgelsesform; Røgelsespresse; Rullebræt til røgelsespinde; Måleske/skovl; Røreskål; Blandespatel; Beskyttelseshandsker; Si/dørslag; Stempel/segl; Opbevaringsglas/-beholder; Andet
en: Incense tool type: Cutting tool; Drying rack; Funnel; Grinding tool (mortar & pestle); Incense extruder; Incense mold; Incense press; Incense stick rolling board; Measuring spoon/scoop; Mixing bowl; Mixing spatula; Protective gloves; Sieve/strainer; Stamp/seal; Storage jar/container; Other
ru: Тип инструмента для благовоний: Инструмент для резки; Сушилка; Воронка; Инструмент для измельчения (ступка и пестик); Экструдер для благовоний; Форма для благовоний; Пресс для благовоний; Доска для скручивания палочек; Мерная ложка/совок; Чаша для смешивания; Лопатка для смешивания; Защитные перчатки; Сито/фильтр; Штамп/печать; Банка/контейнер для хранения; Другое
it: Tipo di strumento per l'incenso: Utensile da taglio; Griglia di essiccazione; Imbuto; Strumento di macinazione (mortaio e pestello); Estrusore per incenso; Stampo per incenso; Pressa per incenso; Tavola per rollare bastoncini di incenso; Cucchiaio/misurino dosatore; Ciotola di miscelazione; Spatola di miscelazione; Guanti protettivi; Setaccio/colino; Timbro/sigillo; Barattolo/contenitore per la conservazione; Altro
zh-TW: 製香工具類型: 切割工具; 晾乾架; 漏斗; 研磨工具 (研缽與杵); 製香擠壓器; 香模; 壓香器; 線香搓板; 量匙/勺子; 攪拌碗; 攪拌刮刀; 防護手套; 篩子/濾網; 印章/印模; 儲存罐/容器; 其他
ja: お香の道具タイプ: カッティングツール; 乾燥ラック; 漏斗; 粉砕ツール (すり鉢とすりこぎ); お香用押出機; お香の型; お香用プレス; お香スティック用ローリングボード; 計量スプーン/スクープ; ミキシングボウル; ミキシングスパチュラ; 保護グローブ; ふるい/ストレーナー; スタンプ/印; 保存瓶/容器; その他
pt-PT: Tipo de ferramenta para incenso: Ferramenta de corte; Estendal de secagem; Funil; Ferramenta de trituração (almofariz e pilão); Extrusora de incenso; Molde para incenso; Prensa de incenso; Tábua para enrolar varetas de incenso; Colher/concha de medição; Taça de mistura; Espátula de mistura; Luvas de proteção; Peneira/coador; Carimbo/selo; Frasco/recipiente de armazenamento; Outro
lt-LT: Smilkalų įrankio tipas: Pjovimo įrankis; Džiovinimo stovas; Piltuvas; Malimo įrankis (grūstuvė ir piestelė); Smilkalų ekstruderis; Smilkalų forma; Smilkalų presas; Smilkalų lazdelių sukimo lenta; Matavimo šaukštas / kaušelis; Maišymo dubuo; Maišymo mentelė; Apsauginės pirštinės; Sietelis / filtras; Antspaudas; Laikymo indelis / talpykla; Kita
nl: Wierookgereedschap type: Snijgereedschap; Droogrek; Trechter; Maalgereedschap (vijzel & stamper); Wierook-extruder; Wierookvorm; Wierookpers; Rolplank voor wierookstokjes; Maatlepel/-schepje; Mengkom; Mengspatel; Beschermende handschoenen; Zeef; Stempel/zegel; Voorraadpot/-container; Overig
fi: Suitsuketyökalun tyyppi: Leikkaustyökalu; Kuivausteline; Suppilo; Jauhatustyökalu (mortteli ja survin); Suitsukepuristin; Suitsukemuotti; Suitsukeprässi; Suitsuketikkujen rullauslauta; Mittakauha/-lusikka; Sekoituskulho; Sekoituslasta; Suojakäsineet; Siivilä/sihti; Leima/sinetti; Säilytyspurkki/-astia; Muu
de: Typ des Räucherwerkzeugs: Schneidewerkzeug; Trockengestell; Trichter; Mahlwerkzeug (Mörser & Stößel); Räucherstäbchen-Extruder; Räucherform; Räucherpresse; Rollbrett für Räucherstäbchen; Messlöffel/-schaufel; Rührschüssel; Rührspatel; Schutzhandschuhe; Sieb; Stempel/Siegel; Vorratsglas/-behälter; Sonstiges
sv: Typ av redskap för rökelse: Skärverktyg; Torkställning; Tratt; Malverktyg (mortel och stöt); Rökelseextruder; Rökelseform; Rökelsepress; Rullbräda för rökelsepinnar; Måttsked/-skopa; Blandskål; Blandspatel; Skyddshandskar; Sil/durkslag; Stämpel/sigill; Förvaringsburk/-behållare; Övrigt